Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-1401
Municipal heat, light, and ice plants; construction; operation.

Cities of the primary class, cities of the first class, cities of the second class, and villages shall have the power to purchase, construct, maintain, and improve heating and lighting systems and ice plants for the use of their respective municipalities and the inhabitants thereof.

Laws 1919, c. 181, § 1, p. 404;

Laws 1921, c. 128, § 1, p. 538;

C.S.1922, § 4396;

C.S.1929, § 18-101;

R.S.1943, § 19-1401;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 115.

City could not buy completely new power plant without an authorizing election. Nacke v. City of Hebron, 155 Neb. 739, 53 N.W.2d 564 (1952).

An action against village under declaratory judgment act alleging violation of above statute by the village board is not properly brought where members of such board are not made parties. Southern Nebraska Power Co. v. Village of Deshler, 130 Neb. 133, 264 N.W. 462 (1936).

Cities of the second class have power to purchase, construct, maintain, and improve lighting systems, but have neither express nor implied power to purchase and pay for them by pledge of future net earnings. Interstate Power Co. v. City of Ainsworth, 125 Neb. 419, 250 N.W. 649 (1933).

A city or village has power to construct and operate an electric light system for the purpose of furnishing lights and pumping water for the use of the city and its inhabitants. Bell v. City of David City, 94 Neb. 157, 142 N.W. 523 (1913).

The power of a city is not limited in constructing a plant to one costing not more than the amount of bonds that may be so issued. Village of Oshkosh v. Fairbanks, Morse & Co., 8 F.2d 329 (8th Cir. 1925).